Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.180

Fees for handling, collecting, disbursing, and accounting for special assessments, fees, rates, or charges.

The county treasurer, in all instances where required by law to handle, collect, disburse, and account for special assessments, fees, rates, or charges within the county, may charge and collect a fee for services not to exceed four dollars per parcel for each year in which the funds are collected. Such charges for services shall be based upon costs incurred by the treasurer in handling, collecting, disbursing, and accounting for the funds.

Such fees shall be a charge against the district and shall be credited to the county current expense fund by the county treasurer.

[ 1991 c 245 s 8; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.180. Prior: 1961 c 270 s 1.]